Washington statutes.
RCW 18.106.040

Examinations—Eligibility requirements—Determination.

(1) Upon receipt of the application and evidence set forth in RCW 18.106.030, the director shall review the same and make a determination as to whether the applicant is eligible to take an examination for the certificate of competency. To be eligible to take the examination:

(a) Each applicant for a journey level plumber's certificate of competency shall furnish written evidence that he or she has completed a course of study in the plumbing trade in the armed services of the United States or at a school accredited by the workforce training and education coordinating board, or has had four or more years of experience under the direct supervision of a certified journey level plumber.

(b) Each applicant for a specialty plumber's certificate of competency under RCW 18.106.010(14)(a) shall furnish written evidence that he or she has completed a course of study in the plumbing trade in the armed services of the United States or at a school licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, or that he or she has had at least three years of experience in the specialty under the supervision of a certified journey level plumber or a certified plumber.

(c) Each applicant for a residential service plumber's certificate of competency under RCW 18.106.010(11) shall furnish written evidence that he or she has completed a course of study in the plumbing trade in the armed services of the United States or at a school accredited by the workforce training and education coordinating board, or has had two or more years of experience under the supervision of a certified journey level plumber, certified specialty plumber, or certified residential service plumber.

(d) Each applicant for a specialty plumber's certificate of competency under RCW 18.106.010(14) (b) or (c) shall furnish written evidence that he or she is eligible to take the examination. These eligibility requirements for the specialty plumbers defined by RCW 18.106.010(14)(c) shall be one year of practical experience working on pumping systems not exceeding one hundred gallons per minute, and two years of practical experience working on pumping systems exceeding one hundred gallons per minute, or equivalent as determined by rule by the department in consultation with the advisory board, and that experience may be obtained at the same time the individual is meeting the experience required by RCW 19.28.191. The eligibility requirements for other specialty plumbers shall be established by rule by the director pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section.

(2)(a) The director shall establish reasonable rules for the examinations to be given applicants for certificates of competency. In establishing the rules, the director shall consult with the state advisory board of plumbers as established in RCW 18.106.110.

(b) The director shall establish reasonable criteria by rule for determining an applicant's eligibility to take an examination for the certificate of competency for specialty plumbers under subsection (1)(d) of this section. In establishing the criteria, the director shall consult with the state advisory board of plumbers as established in RCW 18.106.110. These rules must take effect by December 31, 2006.

(3) Upon determination that the applicant is eligible to take the examination, the director shall so notify the applicant, indicating the time and place for taking the same.

(4) No other requirement for eligibility may be imposed.

[ 2020 c 153 s 8; 2013 c 23 s 17; 2006 c 185 s 2; 2001 c 281 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 149 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 71 s 3; 1973 1st ex.s. c 175 s 4.]